Utah statutes.
61-2f-509.   Insufficient funds to satisfy judgments -- Procedure and interest.

If money deposited in the fund and allotted for satisfying a final judgment against a real estate licensee is insufficient to satisfy an order issued in accordance with Section 61-2f-508, when sufficient money is deposited in the fund, the division shall:

(1)  satisfy the unpaid claims in the order that the unpaid claims are originally filed; and

(2)  pay with the claim accumulated interest at the rate of 8% per annum.

